en: Arts & Crafts
xx: Arts & Crafts
cs: Řemesla a koníčky
da: Håndarbejde og hobby
de: Kunsthandwerk & Hobby
es: Manualidades
fr: Loisirs créatifs
it: Artigianato e hobby
ja: クラフト・アート
nl: Handwerk en hobby's
no: Kunst og håndverk
pl: Rękodzieło i hobby
pt: Arte e artesanato
ru: Рукоделие и хобби
sv: Hantverk och hobbyer
tr: Sanatlar ve El İşleri

en: Art & Craft Kits
xx: Art & Craft Kits
cs: Umělecké a hobby sady
da: Sæt til håndarbejde og hobby
de: Kunst- & Bastelsets
es: Kits de manualidades
fr: Kits de loisirs créatifs, Loisirs créatifs pour enfants (jouet)
it: Kit per hobby e artigianato
ja: アート・クラフトキット
nl: Handwerk- en hobbysets
no: Kunst- og håndverkssett
pl: Zestawy do sztuki i rękodzieła
pt: Kits de arte e de artesanato
ru: Наборы для рукоделия и хобби
sv: Hobbysatser
tr: Sanat ve El İşi Setleri

en: Candle Making Kits
xx: Candle Making Kits
cs: Sady na výrobu svíček
da: Sæt til fremstilling af lys
de: Kerzenherstellungssets
es: Kits para fabricar velas
fr: Kits de fabrication de bougies
it: Kit per creare candele
ja: キャンドル製作キット
nl: Sets om kaarsen te maken
no: Lyslagingssett
pl: Zestawy do wyrobu świec
pt: Kits para velas artesanais
ru: Наборы для изготовления свечей
sv: Ljusstöpningssats
tr: Mum Yapımı Setleri

en: Drawing & Painting Kits
xx: Drawing & Painting Kits
cs: Sady na kreslení a malování
da: Tegne- og malesæt
de: Zeichen- & Malsets
es: Kits de dibujo y pintura
fr: Coffrets à dessin et peinture
it: Kit da disegno e pittura
ja: 画材セット
nl: Teken- en schildersets
no: Tegne- og malesett
pl: Zestawy do rysowania i malowania
pt: Kits para desenho e pintura
ru: Наборы для рисования
sv: Tecknings- och målningskit
tr: Çizim ve Boyama Setleri

en: Fabric Repair Kits
xx: Fabric Repair Kits
cs: Sady na opravu textilií
da: Stof – reparationssæt
de: Flicksets
es: Kits de reparación de telas
fr: Kits de réparation pour tissu
it: Kit di riparazione per tessuto
ja: 布用修繕キット
nl: Textielreparatiesets
no: Stoffreparasjonssett
pl: Zestawy do naprawy tkanin
pt: Kits para reparos em tecido
ru: Наборы для ремонта ткани
sv: Tygreparationskit
tr: Kumaş Tamir Setleri

en: Incense Making Kits
xx: Incense Making Kits
cs: Sady na výrobu vonných tyčinek
da: Sæt til fremstilling af røgelse
de: Sets für die Räucherwerkherstellung
es: Kits para la elaboración de incienso
fr: Kits de fabrication d'encens
it: Kit per la fabbricazione di incenso
ja: 手作りお香キット
nl: Kits voor het maken van wierook
no: Sett for produksjon av røkelse
pl: Zestawy do robienia kadzidełek
pt: Kits para fabricação de incenso
ru: Наборы для изготовления благовоний
sv: Kit för rökelsetillverkning
tr: Tütsü Yapım Setleri

en: Jewelry Making Kits
xx: Jewelry Making Kits
cs: Sady na výrobu bižuterie
da: Sæt til fremstilling af smykker
de: Schmuckherstellungssets
es: Kits para fabricar joyas
fr: Kits de fabrication de bijoux
it: Kit per creare gioielli
ja: ジュエリー製作キット
nl: Sets om sieraden te maken
no: Smykkelagingssett
pl: Zestawy do wyrobu biżuterii
pt: Kits para bijuteria
ru: Наборы для изготовления ювелирных украшений
sv: Smyckestillverkningssats
tr: Takı Yapımı Setleri

en: Mosaic Kits
xx: Mosaic Kits
cs: Mozaikové sady
da: Mosaiksæt
de: Mosaikbausätze
es: Kits para mosaicos
fr: Kits de mosaïques
it: Kit per mosaici
ja: モザイク制作キット
nl: Sets voor mozaïeken
no: Mosaikksett
pl: Zestawy do mozaik
pt: Kits de mosaicos
ru: Наборы мозаики
sv: Mosaikkit
tr: Mozaik Setleri

en: Needlecraft Kits
xx: Needlecraft Kits
cs: Sady na vyšívání
da: Stramajbroderi – sæt
de: Sticksets
es: Kits de bordado
fr: Kits de travaux d'aiguille
it: Kit per ricamo
ja: 針編み刺繍キット
nl: Borduurpakketten
no: Broderisett
pl: Zestawy do haftu gobelinowego
pt: Kits de bordado
ru: Наборы для вышивания
sv: Broderikit
tr: Dikiş Setleri

en: Scrapbooking & Stamping Kits
xx: Scrapbooking & Stamping Kits
cs: Sady pro scrapbooking a razítkování
da: Sæt til scrapbøger og stempelsæt
de: Scrapbooking- & Stempelsets
es: Kits para fabricar sellos y álbumes de recortes
fr: Kits de scrapbooking et de décoration au tampon
it: Kit per creare timbri e album di ricordi
ja: スクラップブック・スタンプ製作キット
nl: Sets voor plakboeken en stempelen
no: Utklippsbok- og stempelsett
pl: Scrapbooking i stemplowanie
pt: Kits para scrapbooking e carimbagem
ru: Наборы для изготовления фотоальбомов и тиснения
sv: Scrapbooking- och stämpelsatser
tr: Koleksiyon Defterleri ve Kabartma Setleri

en: Toy Craft Kits
xx: Toy Craft Kits
cs: Dětské stavebnice
da: Kreativitetssæt
de: Bastelsets
es: Kits de artesanía con juguetes
fr: Coffrets de loisirs créatifs
it: Kit per realizzare giochi
ja: 工作玩具セット
nl: Kits voor kinderspeelgoed
no: Håndarbeidslekesett
pl: Dziecięce zestawy do majsterkowania
pt: Kits para brinquedos artesanais
ru: Наборы для детского творчества
sv: Leksakskonstset
tr: Oyuncak El İşi Kitleri

en: Art & Crafting Materials
xx: Art & Crafting Materials
cs: Materiál pro umění a řemesla
da: Materialer til håndarbejde og hobby
de: Kunst- & Bastelmaterialien
es: Materiales para manualidades
fr: Matériaux pour loisirs créatifs
it: Materiali per hobby e artigianato
ja: アート・クラフト用素材
nl: Handwerk- en hobbymaterialen
no: Kunst- og håndverkmaterialer
pl: Materiały dla artystów i rękodzielników
pt: Materiais de arte e de artesanato
ru: Материалы для рукоделия и хобби
sv: Hobbymaterial
tr: Sanat ve El İşleri Malzemeleri

en: Art & Craft Paper
xx: Art & Craft Paper
cs: Umělecký papír
da: Kunstpapir
de: Papier für Kunstarbeiten
es: Papel para manualidades
fr: Papier pour loisirs créatifs
it: Carta per hobby e artigianato
ja: アート紙
nl: Tekenpapier
no: Kunsttrykkpapir
pl: Rękodzieło z papieru
pt: Papel para arte e artesanato
ru: Бумага для художественных работ
sv: Hobbypapper
tr: Kuşe Kağıt

en: Cardstock & Scrapbooking Paper
xx: Cardstock & Scrapbooking Paper
cs: Karton a scrapbookový papír
da: Karton og papir til scrapbøger
de: Kartenkarton & Scrapbooking-Papier
es: Papel para álbum de recortes y cartulina
fr: Papier cartonné et papier pour scrapbooking
it: Carta per album di ricordi e cartoncini
ja: カード用紙・スクラップブック用紙
nl: Effen en gemarmerd karton
no: Kartong og utklippsbokpapir
pl: Tektura i papier do scrapbookingu
pt: Cartolinas e papel para scrapbooking
ru: Бумага для открыток и фотоальбомов
sv: Kartong och scrapbooking-papper
tr: Kartvizit ve Koleksiyon Defteri Kağıdı

en: Cardstock
xx: Cardstock
cs: Tvrdý papír
da: Let karton
de: Karton
es: Cartulina
fr: Papier cartonné
it: Cartoncino
ja: カード用紙
nl: Kaartkarton
no: Kartong
pl: Brystol
pt: Cardstock
ru: Карточная бумага
sv: Cardstock
tr: Karton Kağıt

en: Scrapbooking Paper
xx: Scrapbooking Paper
cs: Papír na scrapbooking
da: Scrapbogspapir
de: Scrapbooking-Papier
es: Papel para álbum de recortes
fr: Papier pour scrapbooking
it: Carta per album
ja: スクラップブック用紙
nl: Scrapbookpapier
no: Papir til utklippsbok
pl: Papier do scrapbookingu
pt: Papel para scrapbook
ru: Бумага для скрапбукинга
sv: Scrapbookingpapper
tr: Scrapbook Kağıdı

en: Construction Paper
xx: Construction Paper
cs: Hrubý papír
da: Karton
de: Bastelpapier
es: Cartulinas
fr: Papier de construction
it: Cartoncino colorato
ja: 工作用紙
nl: Knutselpapier
no: Konstruksjonspapir
pl: Papiery kolorowe
pt: Cartolina
ru: Бумага для черчения
sv: Konstruktionspapper
tr: Konstrüksiyon Kağıdı

en: Craft Foil
xx: Craft Foil
cs: Dekorativní kovové fólie
da: Metalpapir og metalkarton
de: Bastelfolie
es: Papel de aluminio para manualidades
fr: Papiers spéciaux
it: Lamine per fai da te
ja: 工作用アルミホイル
nl: Hobbyfolie
no: Hobbyfolie
pl: Folie ozdobne
pt: Papel de alumínio para artesanato
ru: Фольга для рукоделия
sv: Metallpapper
tr: El İşi Folyosu

en: Drawing & Painting Paper
xx: Drawing & Painting Paper
cs: Papír pro kreslení a malování
da: Kunst- og tegnepapir
de: Zeichen- & Malpapier
es: Papel para dibujo y pintura
fr: Papier pour dessin et peinture
it: Carta per acquerello e disegno
ja: 画用紙
nl: Teken- en schilderpapier
no: Papir til maling og tegning
pl: Papier do rysowania i malowania
pt: Papel para desenho e pintura
ru: Бумага для рисования
sv: Rit- och målarpapper
tr: Çizim ve Boyama Kağıdı

en: Origami Paper
xx: Origami Paper
cs: Papír pro origami
da: Origamipapir
de: Origami-Papier
es: Papel para origami
fr: Papier origami
it: Carta per origami
ja: 折り紙
nl: Origamipapier
no: Origamipapir
pl: Papiery do origami
pt: Papel para origami
ru: Бумага для оригами
sv: Origamipapper
tr: Origami Kağıdı